Hawaii statutes.
§88-59.5 Previous membership service credit
for legislative officers. (a) Any member who on July 1, 1991, was serving
or previously served as an assistant clerk or assistant sergeant at arms of
either house of the legislature and becomes eligible for retirement benefits as
a class A member as provided under sections 88-73(a), 88-74(d), and 88-76 shall
be entitled to full service credit as a class A member for any eligible service
prior to July 1, 1991; provided that:

(1) The member claims those years as membership
service credit and purchases that membership service credit in accordance with
section 88-59; and

(2) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary:

(A) If the member was a class A member of the
system and elected to become a class C member pursuant to section 88-271, the
member repurchases all the years of service as a class C member in accordance
with the procedures under section 88-59 to regain standing as a contributory
member; and

(B) A class C member shall be credited for
service as an assistant clerk or assistant sergeant at arms under section 88-59
in a lump sum nonrefundable payment and receive retirement benefits as provided
in this section.

(b) Any retirant who returns to employment and
is enrolled as a member of the system will have previous service as an
assistant clerk or assistant sergeant at arms recognized as provided in this
section. [L 1991, c 96, §1(1); am L 2005, c 58, §6; am L 2007, c 215, §5; am L
2011, c 163, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next